California statutes. Penal Code
(1) The person to whom the assault weapon or .50 BMG rifle is lent is 18 years of age or over and is not prohibited by state or federal law from possessing, receiving, owning, or purchasing a firearm.

(2) The person to whom the assault weapon or .50 BMG rifle is lent remains in the presence of the registered possessor of the assault weapon or .50 BMG rifle.

(3) The assault weapon or .50 BMG rifle is possessed at any of the following locations:

(A) While on a target range that holds a regulatory or business license for the purpose of practicing shooting at that target range.

(B) While on the premises of a target range of a public or private club or organization organized for the purpose of practicing shooting at targets.

(C) While attending any exhibition, display, or educational project that is about firearms and that is sponsored by, conducted under the auspices of, or approved by a law enforcement agency or a nationally or state recognized entity that fosters proficiency in, or promotes education about, firearms.

(b) Section 30600 shall not
 apply to the return of an assault weapon or .50 BMG rifle to the registered possessor, or the lawful possessor, which is lent by that registered or lawful possessor pursuant to subdivision (a).

(c) Sections 30605 and 30610 shall not apply to the possession of an assault weapon or .50 BMG rifle by a person to whom an assault weapon or .50 BMG rifle is lent pursuant to subdivision (a).

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 6.   (SB 1080)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 711.)
-------------------------------------------

30665.

Sections 30600, 30605, and 30610 shall not apply to the possession and importation of an assault weapon or a .50 BMG rifle into this state by a nonresident if all of the following conditions are met:

(a) The person is attending or going directly to or coming directly from an organized competitive match or league competition that involves the use of an assault weapon or a .50 BMG rifle.

(b) The competition or match is conducted on the premises of one of the following:

(1) A target range that holds a regulatory or business license for the purpose of practicing shooting at that target
 range.

(2) A target range of a public or private club or organization that is organized for the purpose of practicing shooting at targets.

(c) The match or competition is sponsored by, conducted under the auspices of, or approved by, a law enforcement agency or a nationally or state recognized entity that fosters proficiency in, or promotes education about, firearms.

(d) The assault weapon or .50 BMG rifle is transported in accordance with Section 25610 or Article 3 (commencing with Section 25505) of Chapter 2 of Division 5.

(e) The person is 18 years of age or over and is not in a class of persons prohibited from possessing firearms by virtue of Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 29800) or Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 29900) of Division 9 of this
 code or Section 8100 or 8103 of the Welfare and Institutions Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 6.   (SB 1080)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 711.)
-------------------------------------------

30670.

(a) Section 30600 shall not apply to the importation into this state of an assault weapon or a .50 BMG rifle by the registered owner of that assault weapon or a .50 BMG rifle if it is in accordance with the provisions of Section 30945.

(b) Section 30600 shall not apply during the first 180 days of the 2005 calendar year to the importation into this state of a .50 BMG rifle by a person who lawfully possessed that .50 BMG rifle in this state prior to January 1, 2005.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 6.   (SB 1080)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 711.)
-------------------------------------------

30675.

(a) Sections 30605 and 30610 shall not apply to any of the following persons:

(1) A person acting in accordance with Section 31000 or 31005.

(2) A person who has a permit to possess an assault weapon or a .50 BMG rifle issued pursuant to Section 31000 or 31005 when that person is acting in accordance with Section 31000 or 31005 or Article 5 (commencing with Section 30900).

(b) Sections 30600, 30605, and 30610 shall not apply to any of the following persons:

(1) A person acting in accordance with Article
 5 (commencing with Section 30900).

(2) A person acting in accordance with Section 31000, 31005, 31050, or 31055.

(c) Sections 30605 and 30610 shall not apply to the registered owner of an assault weapon or a .50 BMG rifle possessing that firearm in accordance with Section 30945.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 6.   (SB 1080)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 711.)
-------------------------------------------

30680.

Section 30605 does not apply to the possession of an assault weapon by a person who has possessed the assault weapon prior to January 1, 2017, if all of the following are applicable:

(a) Prior to January 1, 2017, the person would have been eligible to register that assault weapon pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 30900.

(b) The person lawfully possessed that assault weapon prior to January 1, 2017.

(c) The person registers the assault weapon by July 1, 2018, in accordance with subdivision (b) of Section 30900.

(History: Amended (as added by Stats. 2016, Ch. 40, Sec. 2) by Stats. 2017, Ch. 17, Sec. 47.   (AB 103)   Effective June 27, 2017.   See similar section (added by Stats. 2016, Ch. 48), as amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 17, Sec. 48.)
-------------------------------------------

30680.

Section 30605 does not apply to the possession of an assault weapon by a person who has possessed the assault weapon prior to January 1, 2017, if all of the following are applicable:

(a) Prior to January 1, 2017, the person was eligible to register that assault weapon pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 30900.

(b) The person lawfully possessed that assault weapon prior to January 1, 2017.

(c) The person registers the assault weapon by July 1, 2018, in accordance with subdivision (b) of Section 30900.

(History: Amended (as added by Stats. 2016, Ch. 48, Sec. 2) by Stats. 2017, Ch. 17, Sec. 48.   (AB 103)   Effective June 27, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

30685.

Section 30605 does not apply to the possession of an assault weapon as defined by paragraph (9), (10), or (11) of subdivision (a) of Section 30515 by a person who has possessed the assault weapon prior to September 1, 2020, if all of the following are applicable:

(a) Prior to September 1, 2020, the person would have been eligible to
 register that assault weapon pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 30900.

(b) The person lawfully possessed that assault weapon prior to September 1, 2020.

(c) The person registers the assault weapon by January 1, 2022, in accordance with subdivision (c) of Section 30900.

(History: Added by Stats. 2020, Ch. 29, Sec. 39.   (SB 118)   Effective August 6, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. SKS Rifles  [30710. - 30735.]

30710.

Notwithstanding paragraph (11) of subdivision (a) of Section 30510, an “SKS rifle” under this article means all SKS rifles commonly referred to as “SKS Sporter” versions, manufactured to accept a detachable AK-47 magazine and imported into this state and sold by a licensed gun dealer, or otherwise lawfully possessed in this state by a resident of this state who is not a licensed gun dealer, between January 1, 1992, and December 19, 1997.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 6.   (SB 1080)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 711.)
-------------------------------------------

30715.

(a) (1) Any person who, or firm, company, or corporation that operated a retail or other commercial firm, company, or corporation, and manufactured, distributed, transported, imported, possessed, possessed for sale, offered for sale, or transferred, for commercial purpose, an SKS rifle in California between January 1, 1992, and December 19, 1997, shall be immune from criminal prosecution under Article 2 (commencing with Section 30600) or former Section 12280.

(2) The immunity provided in this subdivision shall apply retroactively to any person who, or firm, company, or corporation that, is or was charged by complaint or indictment with a violation of former Section 12280
 for conduct related to an SKS rifle, whether or not the case of that person, firm, company, or corporation is final.

(b) (1) Any person who possessed, gave, loaned, or transferred an SKS rifle in California between January 1, 1992, and December 19, 1997, shall be immune from criminal prosecution under Article 2 (commencing with Section 30600) or former Section 12280.(2) The immunity provided in this subdivision shall apply retroactively to any person who was charged by complaint or indictment with a violation of former Section 12280 for conduct related to an SKS rifle, whether or not the case of that person is final.

(c) Any SKS rifle in the possession of any person who, or firm, company, or corporation that, is described in subdivision (a) or (b), shall not be subject to seizure by law enforcement for violation of Article 2 (commencing with Section 30600) or former
 Section 12280 prior to January 1, 2000.

(d) Any person, firm, company, or corporation, convicted under former Section 12280 for conduct relating to an SKS rifle, shall be permitted to withdraw a plea of guilty or nolo contendere, or to reopen the case and assert the immunities provided in this article, if the court determines that the allowance of the immunity is in the interests of justice. The court shall interpret this article liberally to the benefit of the defendant.

(e) For purposes of this section, “former Section 12280” refers to former Section 12280, as added by Section 3 of Chapter 19 of the Statutes of 1989 or as subsequently amended.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 6.   (SB 1080)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 711.)
-------------------------------------------

30720.

(a) Any person, firm, company, or corporation that is in possession of an SKS rifle shall do one of the following on or before January 1, 2000:

(1) Relinquish the SKS rifle to the Department of Justice pursuant to subdivision (h) of former Section 12281.

(2) Relinquish the SKS rifle to a law enforcement agency pursuant to former Section 12288, as added by Section 3 of Chapter 19 of the Statutes of 1989.

(3) Dispose of the SKS rifle as permitted by former Section 12285, as it read in Section 20 of Chapter 23 of the Statutes of 1994.

(b) Any person who has obtained title to an SKS rifle by bequest or intestate succession shall be required to comply with paragraph (1) or (2) of subdivision (a) unless that person otherwise complies with paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) of former Section 12285, as it read in Section 20 of Chapter 23 of the Statutes of 1994, or as subsequently amended.

(c) Any SKS rifle relinquished to the department pursuant to this section shall be in a manner prescribed by the department.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 6.   (SB 1080)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 711.)
-------------------------------------------

30725.

(a) Any person who complies with Section 30720 shall be exempt from the prohibitions set forth in Section 30600 or 30605 for those acts by that person associated with complying with the requirements of Section 30720.

(b) Failure to comply with Section 30720 is a public offense punishable by imprisonment pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 1170, or in a county jail, not exceeding one year.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 15, Sec. 551.   (AB 109)   Effective April 4, 2011.   Amending action operative October 1, 2011, by Sec. 636 of Ch. 15, as amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 39, Sec. 68.   Section operative January 1, 2012, pursuant to Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 10.)
-------------------------------------------

30730.

(a) (1) The department shall purchase any SKS rifle relinquished pursuant to Section 30720 from funds appropriated for this purpose by the act amending former Section 12281 in the 1997–98 Regular Session of the Legislature or by subsequent budget acts or other legislation.

(2) The department shall adopt regulations for this purchase program that include, but are not limited to, the manner of delivery, the reimbursement to be paid, and the manner in which persons shall be informed of the state purchase program.

(3) Any person who relinquished possession of an SKS rifle to a law enforcement agency pursuant to
 any version of former Section 12288 prior to the effective date of the purchase program set forth in paragraph (1) shall be eligible to be reimbursed from the purchase program. The procedures for reimbursement pursuant to this paragraph shall be part of the regulations adopted by the department pursuant to paragraph (2).

(b) In addition to the regulations required pursuant to subdivision (a), emergency regulations for the purchase program described in subdivision (a) shall be adopted pursuant to Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 6.   (SB 1080)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 711.)
-------------------------------------------

30735.

(a) The Department of Justice shall notify all district attorneys on or before January 31, 1999, of the provisions of former Section 12281.

(b) The department shall identify all criminal prosecutions in the state for conduct related to SKS rifles on or before April 1, 1999. In all cases so identified by the Attorney General, the district attorneys shall inform defense counsel, or the defendant if the defendant is in propria persona, in writing, of the provisions of former Section 12281 on or before May 1, 1999.

(c) Commencing no later than January 1, 1999, the department shall conduct a public education and notification program as
 described in Section 31115 or in former Section 12289, as added by Section 6 of Chapter 954 of the Statutes of 1991 or as subsequently amended.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 6.   (SB 1080)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 711.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Assault Weapon or .50 BMG Rifle Constituting Nuisance [30800. - 30800.]

30800.

(a) (1) Except as provided in Article 2 (commencing with Section 30600), possession of any assault weapon or of any .50 BMG rifle in violation of this chapter is a public nuisance, solely for purposes of this section and subdivision (c) of Section 18005.

(2) The Attorney General, any district attorney, or any city attorney, may, in lieu of criminal prosecution, bring a civil action or reach a civil compromise in any superior court to enjoin the manufacture of, importation of, keeping for sale of, offering or exposing for sale, giving, lending, or possession of an assault weapon or .50 BMG rifle that is a public nuisance.

(b) (1) Upon motion of the Attorney General, district attorney, or city attorney, a superior court may impose a civil fine not to exceed five hundred dollars ($500) for the manufacture of, importation of, keeping for sale of, offering or exposing for sale, giving, or lending of an assault weapon or .50 BMG rifle that is a public nuisance pursuant to subdivision (a) and up to two hundred dollars ($200) for each additional assault weapon or .50 BMG that is a public nuisance pursuant to subdivision (a).

(2) Upon motion of the Attorney General, district attorney, or city attorney, a superior court may impose a civil fine not to exceed three hundred dollars ($300) for the possession of an assault weapon or .50 BMG rifle that is a public nuisance pursuant to subdivision (a) and up to one hundred dollars ($100) for each additional
 assault weapon or .50 BMG rifle possessed, that is a public nuisance pursuant to subdivision (a).

(c) Any assault weapon or .50 BMG rifle deemed a public nuisance under subdivision (a) shall be destroyed in a manner so that it may no longer be used, except upon a finding by a court, or a declaration from the Department of Justice, district attorney, or city attorney stating that the preservation of the assault weapon or .50 BMG rifle is in the interest of justice.

(d) Upon conviction of any misdemeanor or felony involving the illegal possession or use of an assault weapon, the assault weapon shall be deemed a public nuisance and disposed of pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 18005.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 730, Sec. 7.   (AB 879)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Registration of Assault Weapons and .50 BMG Rifles and Related Rules [30900. - 30965.]

30900.

(a) (1) Any person who, prior to June 1, 1989, lawfully possessed an assault weapon, as defined in former Section 12276, as added by Section 3 of Chapter 19 of the Statutes of 1989, shall register the firearm by January 1, 1991, and any person who lawfully possessed an assault weapon prior to the date it was specified as an assault weapon pursuant to former Section 12276.5, as added by Section 3 of Chapter 19 of the Statutes of 1989 or as amended by Section 1 of Chapter 874 of the Statutes of 1990 or Section 3 of Chapter 954 of the Statutes of 1991, shall register the firearm within 90 days with the Department of Justice pursuant to those procedures that the department may establish.

(2) Except as provided in Section 30600, any person who
 lawfully possessed an assault weapon prior to the date it was defined as an assault weapon pursuant to former Section 12276.1, as it read in Section 7 of Chapter 129 of the Statutes of 1999, and which was not specified as an assault weapon under former Section 12276, as added by Section 3 of Chapter 19 of the Statutes of 1989 or as amended at any time before January 1, 2001, or former Section 12276.5, as added by Section 3 of Chapter 19 of the Statutes of 1989 or as amended at any time before January 1, 2001, shall register the firearm by January 1, 2001, with the department pursuant to those procedures that the department may establish.

(3) The registration shall contain a description of the firearm that identifies it uniquely, including all identification marks, the full name, address, date of birth, and thumbprint of the owner, and any
 other information that the department may deem appropriate.

(4) The department may charge a fee for registration of up to twenty dollars ($20) per person but not to exceed the reasonable processing costs of the department. After the department establishes fees sufficient to reimburse the department for processing costs, fees charged shall increase at a rate not to exceed the legislatively approved annual cost-of-living adjustment for the department’s budget or as otherwise increased through the Budget Act but not to exceed the reasonable costs of the department. The fees shall be deposited into the Dealers’ Record of Sale Special Account.

(b) (1) Any person who, from January 1, 2001, to December 31, 2016, inclusive, lawfully possessed an assault weapon that does
 not have a fixed magazine, as defined in Section 30515, including those weapons with an ammunition feeding device that can be readily removed from the firearm with the use of a tool, shall register the firearm before July 1, 2018, but not before the effective date of the regulations adopted pursuant to paragraph (5), with the department pursuant to those procedures that the department may establish by regulation pursuant to paragraph (5).

(2) Registrations shall be submitted electronically via the Internet utilizing a public-facing application made available by the department.

(3) The registration shall contain a description of the firearm that identifies it uniquely, including all identification marks, the date the firearm was acquired, the name and address of the individual
 from whom, or business from which, the firearm was acquired, as well as the registrant’s full name, address, telephone number, date of birth, sex, height, weight, eye color, hair color, and California driver’s license number or California identification card number.

(4) The department may charge a fee in an amount of up to fifteen dollars ($15) per person but not to exceed the reasonable processing costs of the department. The fee shall be paid by debit or credit card at the time that the electronic registration is submitted to the department. The fee shall be deposited in the Dealers’ Record of Sale Special Account to be used for purposes of this section.

(5) The department shall adopt regulations for the purpose of implementing this subdivision. These regulations are exempt from the
 Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code).

(c) (1) Any person who, prior to September 1, 2020, lawfully possessed an assault weapon as defined by paragraph (9), (10), or (11) of subdivision (a) of Section 30515, and is eligible to register an assault weapon as set forth in Section 30950, shall submit an application to register the firearm before January 1, 2022, but not before the effective date of the regulations adopted pursuant to paragraph (5), with the department pursuant to those procedures that the department may establish by regulation pursuant to paragraph
 (5).

(2) Registration applications shall be submitted in a manner and format to be specified by the department in regulations adopted pursuant to paragraph (5).

(3) The registration application shall contain a description of the firearm that identifies it uniquely, including all identification marks, the date the firearm was acquired, the name and address of the individual from whom, or business from which, the firearm was acquired, as well as the registrant’s full name, address, telephone number, date of birth, sex, height, weight, eye color, hair color, and California driver’s license number or California identification card number, and any other information that the department may deem appropriate. The registration application shall also contain photographs of the firearm, as
 specified by the department in regulations adopted pursuant to paragraph (5).

(4) For each registration application, the department may charge a fee that consists of the amount the department is authorized to require a dealer to charge each firearm purchaser under subdivision (a) of Section 28233, not to exceed the reasonable processing costs of the department. For registration applications seeking to register multiple firearms, the fee shall increase by up to five dollars ($5) for each additional firearm after the first, not to exceed the reasonable processing costs of the department. The fee shall be paid in a manner specified by the department in regulations adopted
 pursuant to paragraph (5) at the time the registration application is submitted to the department. The fee shall be deposited in the Dealers’ Record of Sale Special Account to be used for purposes of this section.

(5) The department shall adopt regulations for the purpose of implementing this subdivision and paragraphs (9), (10), and (11) of subdivision (a) of Section 30515. These regulations are exempt from the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2020, Ch. 29, Sec. 40.   (SB 118)   Effective August 6, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

30905.

(a) Except as provided in Section 30600, any person who lawfully possesses any .50 BMG rifle prior to January 1, 2005, that is not specified as an assault weapon under former Section 12276, as it reads in Section 19 of Chapter 606 of the Statutes of 1993, or former Section 12276.5, as it reads in Section 3 of Chapter 954 of the Statutes of 1991, or defined as an assault weapon pursuant to former Section 12276.1, as it reads in Section 3 of Chapter 911 of the Statutes of 2002, shall register the .50 BMG rifle with the department no later than April 30, 2006, pursuant to those procedures that the department may establish.(b) The registration shall contain a description of the firearm that identifies it uniquely, including all
 identification marks, the full name, address, date of birth, and thumbprint of the owner, and any other information that the department may deem appropriate.

(c) The department may charge a fee for registration of twenty-five dollars ($25) per person to cover the actual processing and public education campaign costs of the department. The fees shall be deposited into the Dealers’ Record of Sale Special Account. Data-processing costs associated with modifying the department’s data system to accommodate .50 caliber BMG rifles shall not be paid from the Dealers’ Record of Sale Special Account.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 6.   (SB 1080)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 711.)
-------------------------------------------

30910.

Except as provided in Section 30925, no assault weapon possessed pursuant to this article may be sold or transferred on or after January 1, 1990, to anyone within this state other than to a licensed gun dealer or as provided in Section 31100.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 6.   (SB 1080)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 711.)
-------------------------------------------

30915.

Any person who obtains title to an assault weapon registered under this article or that was possessed pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 30630 by bequest or intestate succession shall, within 90 days, do one or more of the following:

(a) Render the weapon permanently inoperable.

(b) Sell the weapon to a licensed gun dealer.

(c) Obtain a permit from the Department of Justice in the same manner as specified in Article 3 (commencing with Section 32650) of Chapter 6.

(d) Remove the weapon from this state.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 6.   (SB 1080)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 711.)
-------------------------------------------

30920.

(a) Any person who lawfully possessed a firearm subsequently declared to be an assault weapon pursuant to former Section 12276.5, as it reads in Section 3 of Chapter 19 of the Statutes of 1989, Section 1 of Chapter 874 of the Statutes of 1990, or Section 3 of Chapter 954 of the Statutes of 1991, or subsequently defined as an assault weapon pursuant to former Section 12276.1, as that section read at any time from when it was enacted by Section 7 of Chapter 129 of the Statutes of 1999 to when it was repealed by the Deadly Weapons Recodification Act of 2010, shall, within 90 days, do one or more of the following:

(1) Render the weapon permanently inoperable.

(2) Sell the weapon to a licensed gun dealer.

(3) Obtain a permit from the Department of Justice in the same manner as specified in Article 3 (commencing with Section 32650) of Chapter 6.

(4) Remove the weapon from this state.

(b) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), a person who lawfully possessed a firearm that was subsequently declared to be an assault weapon pursuant to former Section 12276.5 may alternatively register the firearm within 90 days of the declaration issued pursuant to subdivision (f) of former Section 12276.5, as it reads in Section 3 of Chapter 19 of the Statutes of 1989, Section 1 of Chapter 874 of the Statutes of 1990, or Section 3 of Chapter 954 of the Statutes of 1991.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 6.   (SB 1080)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 711.)
-------------------------------------------

30925.

A person moving into this state, otherwise in lawful possession of an assault weapon, shall do one of the following:

(a) Prior to bringing the assault weapon into this state, that person shall first obtain a permit from the Department of Justice in the same manner as specified in Article 3 (commencing with Section 32650) of Chapter 6.

(b) The person shall cause the assault weapon to be delivered to a licensed gun dealer in this state in accordance with Chapter 44 (commencing with Section 921) of Title 18 of the United States Code and the regulations issued pursuant thereto. If the person obtains a permit from the Department of Justice in the same
 manner as specified in Article 3 (commencing with Section 32650) of Chapter 6, the dealer shall redeliver that assault weapon to the person. If the licensed gun dealer is prohibited from delivering the assault weapon to a person pursuant to this section, the dealer shall possess or dispose of the assault weapon as allowed by this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 6.   (SB 1080)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 711.)
-------------------------------------------

30930.

Except as provided in Section 30940, no .50 BMG rifle possessed pursuant to this article may be sold or transferred on or after January 1, 2005, to anyone within this state other than to a licensed gun dealer or as provided in Section 31100.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 6.   (SB 1080)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 711.)
-------------------------------------------

30935.

Any person who obtains title to a .50 BMG rifle registered under this article or that was possessed pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 30630 by bequest or intestate succession shall, within 180 days of receipt, do one or more of the following:(a) Render the weapon permanently inoperable.

(b) Sell the weapon to a licensed gun dealer.

(c) Obtain a permit from the Department of Justice in the same manner as specified in Article 3 (commencing with Section 32650) of Chapter 6.

(d) Remove the weapon from this state.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 6.   (SB 1080)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 711.)
-------------------------------------------

30940.

A person moving into this state, otherwise in lawful possession of a .50 BMG rifle, shall do one of the following:

(a) Prior to bringing the .50 BMG rifle into this state, that person shall first obtain a permit from the Department of Justice in the same manner as specified in Article 3 (commencing with Section 32650) of Chapter 6.

(b) The person shall cause the .50 BMG rifle to be delivered to a licensed gun dealer in this state in accordance with Chapter 44 (commencing with Section 921) of Title 18 of the United States Code and the regulations issued pursuant thereto. If the person obtains a permit from the Department of Justice in the same manner as
 specified in Article 3 (commencing with Section 32650) of Chapter 6, the dealer shall redeliver that .50 BMG rifle to the person. If the licensed gun dealer is prohibited from delivering the .50 caliber BMG rifle to a person pursuant to this section, the dealer shall dispose of the .50 BMG rifle as allowed by this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 6.   (SB 1080)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 711.)
-------------------------------------------

30945.

Unless a permit allowing additional uses is first obtained under Section 31000, a person who has registered an assault weapon or registered a .50 BMG rifle under this article may possess it only under any of the following conditions:

(a) At that person’s residence, place of business, or other property owned by that person, or on property owned by another with the owner’s express permission.

(b) While on the premises of a target range of a public or private club or organization organized for the purpose of practicing shooting at targets.

(c) While on a target range that holds a regulatory
 or business license for the purpose of practicing shooting at that target range.

(d) While on the premises of a shooting club that is licensed pursuant to the Fish and Game Code.

(e) While attending any exhibition, display, or educational project that is about firearms and that is sponsored by, conducted under the auspices of, or approved by a law enforcement agency or a nationally or state recognized entity that fosters proficiency in, or promotes education about, firearms.

(f) While on publicly owned land, if the possession and use of a firearm described in Section 30510, 30515, 30520, or 30530, is specifically permitted by the managing agency of the land.

(g) While transporting the assault weapon or .50 BMG rifle between any of the places mentioned
 in this section, or to any licensed gun dealer, for servicing or repair pursuant to Section 31050, if the assault weapon is transported as required by Sections 16850 and 25610.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 6.   (SB 1080)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 711.)
-------------------------------------------

30950.

No person who is under the age of 18 years, and no person who is prohibited by state or federal law from possessing, receiving, owning, or purchasing a firearm, may register or possess an assault weapon or .50 BMG rifle.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 6.   (SB 1080)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 711.)
-------------------------------------------

30955.

(a) The department’s registration procedures shall provide the option of joint registration for any assault weapon or .50 BMG rifle owned by family members residing in the same household.

(b) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), for registration of assault weapons in accordance with subdivision (c) of Section 30900, joint registration is not permitted.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2020, Ch. 29, Sec. 41.   (SB 118)   Effective August 6, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

30960.

(a) For 90 days following January 1, 1992, a forgiveness period shall exist to allow any person specified in subdivision (b) of former Section 12280, as it reads in Section 4.5 of Chapter 954 of the Statutes of 1991, to register with the Department of Justice any assault weapon that the person lawfully possessed prior to June 1, 1989.

(b) (1) Any person who registers an assault weapon during the 90-day forgiveness period described in subdivision (a), and any person whose registration form was received by the Department of Justice after January 1, 1991, and who was issued a temporary registration prior to the end of the forgiveness period, shall not be charged with a
 violation of subdivision (b) of former Section 12280, as added by Section 3 of Chapter 19 of the Statutes of 1989 or as subsequently amended, if law enforcement becomes aware of that violation only as a result of the registration of the assault weapon.

(2) This section shall have no effect upon any person charged prior to January 1, 1992, with a violation of subdivision (b) of former Section 12280 as added by Section 3 of Chapter 19 of the Statutes of 1989 or as subsequently amended, provided that law enforcement was aware of the violation before the weapon was registered.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 6.   (SB 1080)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 711.)
-------------------------------------------

30965.

(a) Any person who registered a firearm as an assault weapon pursuant to the provisions of law in effect prior to January 1, 2000, where the assault weapon is thereafter defined as an assault weapon pursuant to Section 30515 or former Section 12276.1, as that section read at any time from when it was enacted by Section 7 of Chapter 129 of the Statutes of 1999 to when it was repealed by the Deadly Weapons Recodification Act of 2010, shall be deemed to have registered the weapon for purposes of this chapter and shall not be required to reregister the weapon pursuant to this article.

(b) Any person who legally registered a firearm as an assault weapon pursuant to the
 provisions of law in effect prior to January 1, 2005, where the assault weapon is thereafter defined as a .50 caliber BMG rifle pursuant to Section 30530 or former Section 12278, shall be deemed to have registered the weapon for purposes of this chapter and shall not be required to reregister the weapon pursuant to this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 6.   (SB 1080)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 711.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. Permits for Assault Weapons and .50 BMG Rifles [31000. - 31005.]

31000.

(a) Any person who lawfully acquired an assault weapon before June 1, 1989, or a .50 BMG rifle before January 1, 2005, and wishes to use it in a manner different than specified in Section 30945 shall first obtain a permit from the Department of Justice in the same manner as specified in Article 3 (commencing with Section 32650) of Chapter 6.

(b) Any person who lawfully acquired an assault weapon between June 1, 1989, and January 1, 1990, and wishes to keep it after January 1, 1990, shall first obtain a permit from the Department of Justice in the same manner as specified in Article 3 (commencing with Section 32650) of Chapter 6.

(c) Any person who wishes to
 acquire an assault weapon after January 1, 1990, or a .50 BMG rifle after January 1, 2005, shall first obtain a permit from the Department of Justice in the same manner as specified in Article 3 (commencing with Section 32650) of Chapter 6.

(d) On and after January 1, 2014, no partnership, corporation, limited liability company, association, or any other group or entity, regardless of how the entity was created, may be issued a permit to possess an assault weapon or a .50 BMG rifle.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 54, Sec. 16.   (SB 1461)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

31005.

(a) The Department of Justice may, upon a finding of good cause, issue permits for the manufacture or sale of assault weapons or .50 BMG rifles for the sale to, purchase by, or possession of assault weapons or .50 BMG rifles by, any of the following:

(1) The agencies listed in Section 30625, and the officers described in Section 30630.

(2) Entities and persons who have been issued permits pursuant to this section or Section 31000.

(3) Federal law enforcement and military agencies.

(4) Law enforcement
 and military agencies of other states.

(5) Foreign governments and agencies approved by the United States State Department.

(6) Entities outside the state who have, in effect, a federal firearms dealer’s license solely for the purpose of distribution to an entity listed in paragraphs (3) to (5), inclusive.

(b) Application for the permits, the keeping and inspection thereof, and the revocation of permits shall be undertaken in the same manner as specified in Article 3 (commencing with Section 32650) of Chapter 6.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 6.   (SB 1080)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 711.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 7. Licensed Gun Dealers [31050. - 31055.]

31050.

(a) Any licensed gun dealer may take possession of any assault weapon or .50 BMG rifle for the purposes of servicing or repair from any person to whom it is legally registered or who has been issued a permit to possess it pursuant to this chapter.
